California statutes. Education Code
(B) If the greatest necessary small school allowance calculated pursuant to paragraph (1) is equal to the amounts computed pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (C) of paragraph (1), the necessary small school allowance shall be calculated based on the amount computed pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1).

(c) For purposes of this section, if the
 average number of full-time teachers or certificated employees is not a whole number, the resulting figure shall be rounded up to the next whole number.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 23.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

42282.

Commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year, for each school district, on account of each necessary small school, as defined in Section 42283, the Superintendent shall make the following computations:

(a) For each necessary small school that has an average daily attendance during the fiscal year of less than 25, excluding pupils attending the 7th and 8th grades of a junior high school, and for which school at least one teacher was hired full time, the Superintendent shall compute for the school district
 three hundred thirty-two thousand nine hundred forty-eight dollars ($332,948).

(b) For each necessary small school that has an average daily attendance during the fiscal year of 25 or more and less than 49, excluding pupils attending the 7th and 8th grades of a junior high school, and for which school at least two teachers were hired full time for more than one-half of the days schools were maintained, the Superintendent shall compute for the school district six hundred fifty-eight thousand eight hundred eighty-six dollars ($658,886).

(c) For each necessary small school that has an average
 daily attendance during the fiscal year of 49 or more, but less than 73, excluding pupils attending the 7th and 8th grades of a junior high school, and for which school three teachers were hired full time for more than one-half of the days schools were maintained, the Superintendent shall compute for the school district nine hundred eighty-five thousand one hundred eleven dollars ($985,111).

(d) For each necessary small school that has an average daily attendance during the fiscal year of 73 or more and less than 97, excluding pupils attending the 7th and 8th grades of a junior high school, and for which school four teachers were hired full time for more than one-half of the days schools
 were maintained, the Superintendent shall compute for the school district
 one million three hundred eleven thousand forty-seven dollars ($1,311,047).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 54.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

42283.

(a) For purposes of Section 42282, a “necessary small school” is an elementary school with an average daily attendance of less than 97 pupils, excluding pupils attending the 7th and 8th grades of a junior high school, maintained by a school district to which any of the following conditions apply:

(1) If as many as five pupils residing in a school district with fewer than 2,501 units of second principal apportionment average daily attendance and attending kindergarten and grades 1 to 8, inclusive, excluding pupils attending the 7th and 8th grades of a junior high school, in the elementary school with an average daily attendance of less than 97 pupils would be required to travel more than 10 miles one way from a point on a well-traveled road nearest their home to the
 nearest other public elementary school.

(2) If as many as 15 pupils residing in a school district with fewer than 2,501 units of second principal apportionment average daily attendance and attending kindergarten and grades 1 to 8, inclusive, excluding pupils attending the 7th and 8th grades of a junior high school, in the elementary school with an average daily attendance of less than 97 pupils would be required to travel more than five miles one way from a point on a well-traveled road nearest their home to the nearest other public elementary school.

(3) If as many as 15 pupils residing in a school district with more than 2,500 and fewer than 5,001 units of second principal apportionment average daily attendance and attending kindergarten and grades 1 to 8, inclusive, excluding pupils attending the 7th and 8th grades of a junior high school, in the elementary school with an
 average daily attendance of less than 97 pupils would be required to travel more than 30 miles one way from a point on a well-traveled road nearest their home to the nearest other public elementary school.

(b) If topographical or other conditions exist in a school district that would impose unusual hardships if the number of miles specified in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) were required to be traveled, or if during the fiscal year the roads that would be traveled have been impassable for more than an average of two weeks per year for the preceding five years, the governing board of the school district may, on or before April 1, request the Superintendent, in writing, for an exemption from these requirements or for a reduction in the miles required. The request shall be accompanied by a statement of the conditions upon which the request is based, giving the information in a form required by the Superintendent. The Superintendent shall
 cause an investigation to be made, and shall either grant the request to the extent he or she deems necessary, or deny the request.

(c) For purposes of this section, “other public elementary school” is a public school, including a charter school, that serves kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 8, inclusive, excluding grades 7 and 8 of a junior high school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 664, Sec. 2.   (SB 1321)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

42284.

(a) Commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year, for each school district with fewer than 2,501 units of average daily attendance, on account of each necessary small high school, the Superintendent shall make one of the following computations selected with regard only to the number of certificated employees employed or average daily attendance, whichever provides the lesser amount:
 Average daily
 attendanceMinimum number
 of certificated
 employeesAmount to be
 computed per teacher 1–19 1$280,582 1–19 2$400,039 1–19 3$888,617 20–38 4$1,088,635 39–57 5$1,288,656 58–71 6$1,488,674 72–86 7$1,688,695 87–100 8$1,888,714101–114 9$2,088,734115–129 10$2,288,753130–143 11$2,488,774144–171 12$2,688,794172–210 13$3,219,450211–248 14$3,800,714249–286 15$4,381,988(b) For purposes of this section, a “certificated employee” means an equivalent full-time position of an individual holding a credential authorizing service and providing service in any of grades 9 to 12, inclusive, in any secondary school. Any fraction of an equivalent full-time position remaining after all equivalent full-time positions for certificated employees within the school district have been calculated shall be deemed to be a full-time position.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 55.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

42285.

(a) For purposes of Section 42284, a necessary small high school is a high school with an average daily attendance of less than 287 pupils that meets any of the following conditions:

(1) The high school had an average daily attendance of less than 96 pupils in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, during the preceding fiscal year and is more than 15 miles by well-traveled road from the nearest other public high school and either 90 percent of the pupils would be required to travel 20 miles or 25 percent of the pupils would be required to travel 30 miles one way from a point on a well-traveled road nearest their homes to the nearest other public high school.

(2) The high school had an average
 daily attendance of 96 pupils or more and less than 144 pupils in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, during the preceding fiscal year and is more than 10 miles by well-traveled road from the nearest other public high school and either 90 percent of the pupils would be required to travel 18 miles or 25 percent of the pupils would be required to travel 25 miles one way from a point on a well-traveled road nearest their homes to the nearest other public high school.

(3) The high school had an average daily attendance of 144 pupils or more and less than 192 pupils in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, during the preceding fiscal year and is more than
 712 miles by well-traveled road from the nearest other public high school and either 90 percent of the pupils would be required to travel 15 miles or 25 percent of the pupils would be required to travel 20 miles one way from a point on a well-traveled road nearest their homes to the nearest other public high school.

(4) The high school had an average daily attendance of 192 pupils or more and less than 287 pupils in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, during the preceding fiscal year and is more than 5 miles by well-traveled road from the nearest other public high school and
 either 90 percent of the pupils would be required to travel 10 miles or 25 percent of the pupils would be required to travel 15 miles to the nearest other public high school.

(5) Topographical or other conditions exist in the school district that would impose unusual hardships on the pupils if the number of miles specified in
 paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) were required to be traveled. In these cases, the Superintendent may, when requested, and after investigation, grant exceptions from the distance requirements.

(b) For purposes of Section 42284, a necessary small high school also includes
 either of the following:

(1) A high school maintained by a school district for the exclusive purpose of educating juvenile hall pupils or pupils with exceptional needs.

(2) A high school maintained by a unified school district as the only comprehensive high school if the high school has an average daily attendance of less than 287 pupils and the school district has 50 or fewer pupils per square mile of school district territory, as measured by the number of pupils residing in the school district.

(c) For purposes of Section 42284, a necessary small high school does not include a continuation school.

(d) For purposes of this section, “other public high school” is a public school, including a charter school, that serves any of grades 9 to 12, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 32, Sec. 38.   (AB 1808)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

42285.3.

Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 42280 or any other provision of law, a unified school district that is the only school district in a county, that has received more than two million seven hundred thousand dollars ($2,700,000) in federal Forest Reserve funds in the 1992–93 school year and less than one million three hundred thousand dollars ($1,300,000) in federal Forest Reserve funds in the 1996–97 school year, and that has fewer than 4,501 units of average daily attendance in the 1997–98 school year or in subsequent school years shall be eligible to
 receive apportionments pursuant to the schedules for a “necessary small school” and a “necessary small high school,” as set forth in this article, for up to the total number of schools in the district that would have met the criteria for classification as a necessary small school or a necessary small high school in the 1996–97 fiscal year, if the district had fewer than 2,501 units of average daily attendance in the 1996–97 fiscal year, except that this section does not apply in a school year in which an otherwise eligible school district receives more than two million dollars ($2,000,000) in federal Forest Reserve funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 105, Sec. 1.   Effective July 6, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

42287.

(a) For the 1984–85 fiscal year to the 2012–13 fiscal year, inclusive, the Superintendent shall increase the funding amounts specified in Sections 42282 and 42284 by an amount proportionate to the increase applied to the statewide average revenue limit for unified school districts for the then current fiscal year.

(b) For the 2013–14 fiscal year to the 2021–22 fiscal year, inclusive, the Superintendent shall increase the funding amounts specified in Sections 42282 and 42284, as previously increased pursuant to subdivision (a) and Sections 42289 to 42289.5, inclusive, by the percentage calculated pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02 for the then current fiscal year.

(c) Commencing with the 2022–23 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall increase the funding amounts specified in Sections
 42282 and 42284, as previously increased by Sections 42289 to 42289.5, inclusive, by the percentage calculated pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02 for the then current fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 56.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

42289.

Notwithstanding any other law, for each fiscal year through the 2012–13 fiscal year, before calculating the increase in funding amount specified in Section 42287, the Superintendent shall increase the funding amounts specified in Sections 42281, 42282, and 42284, by the product of subdivisions (a) and (b):

(a) The amount per unit of average daily attendance received by the school district pursuant to Section 46201 in the prior fiscal year.

(b) The average daily attendance for each necessary small school and necessary small high school for which the school district received funding in the prior fiscal year pursuant to Section 42281, 42282, or
 42284, as appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 47, Sec. 56.   (AB 97)   Effective July 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

42289.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, for the 1988–89 fiscal year to the 2012–13 fiscal year, inclusive, after calculating the increase in funding amounts specified in Section 42287, the Superintendent shall increase the funding amounts specified in Sections 42281, 42282, and 42284, by the sum of paragraphs (1) and (2):

(1) Compute the product of subparagraphs (A) and (B):

(A) The amount per unit of average daily attendance computed pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 42240.

(B) The average daily attendance for each necessary small school and necessary
 small high school for which the district receives funding in the current fiscal year pursuant to Section 42281, 42282, or 42284, as appropriate.

(2) From the 1990–91 fiscal year to the 2012–13 fiscal year, inclusive, the amount computed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be increased by the percentage cost-of-living increase given to school district revenue limits for the then current fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 47, Sec. 57.   (AB 97)   Effective July 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

42289.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, for the 1989–90 fiscal year to the 2012–13 fiscal year, inclusive, after calculating the increase in funding amounts specified in Section 42287, the Superintendent shall increase the funding amounts specified in Sections 42281, 42282, and 42284, by the sum of paragraphs (1) and (2):

(1) Compute the product of subparagraphs (A) and (B):

(A) The amount per unit of average daily attendance computed pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 54060.5.

(B) The average daily attendance for each necessary small school and necessary
 small high school for which the school district receives funding in the current fiscal year pursuant to Section 42281, 42282, or 42284, as appropriate.

(2) From the 1990–91 fiscal year to the 2012–13 fiscal year, inclusive, the amount computed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be increased by the percentage cost-of-living increase given to school district revenue limits for the then current fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 47, Sec. 58.   (AB 97)   Effective July 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

42289.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, for the 1989–90 fiscal year to the 2012–13 fiscal year, inclusive, after calculating the increase in funding amounts specified in Section 42287, the Superintendent shall increase the funding amounts specified in Sections 42281, 42282, and 42284, by the sum of paragraphs (1) and (2):

(1) Compute the product of subparagraphs (A) and (B):

(A) The amount per unit of average daily attendance computed pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 54060.6.

(B) The average daily attendance for each necessary small school and necessary
 small high school for which the school district receives funding in the current fiscal year pursuant to Section 42281, 42282, or 42284, as appropriate.

(2) From the 1990–91 fiscal year to the 2012–13 fiscal year, inclusive, the amount computed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be increased by the percentage cost-of-living increase given to school district revenue limits for the then current fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 47, Sec. 59.   (AB 97)   Effective July 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

42289.4.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, for the 1989–90 fiscal year to the 2012–13 fiscal year, inclusive, after calculating the increase in funding amounts specified in Section 42287, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall increase the funding amounts specified in Sections 42281, 42282, and 42284, by the sum of paragraphs (1) and (2):

(1) Compute the product of subparagraphs (A) and (B):

(A) The amount per unit of average daily attendance computed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 54060.7.

(B) The average daily attendance for each necessary
 small school and necessary small high school for which the school district receives funding in the current fiscal year pursuant to Section 42281, 42282, or 42284, as appropriate.

(2) From the 1990–91 fiscal year to the 2012–13 fiscal year, inclusive, the amount computed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be increased by the percentage cost-of-living increase given to school district revenue limits for the then current fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 47, Sec. 60.   (AB 97)   Effective July 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

42289.5.

Notwithstanding any other law, the increases determined pursuant to Sections 42289, 42289.1, 42289.3, and 42289.4 shall be permanently increased for the 1998–99 fiscal year by the quotient, for each school district eligible for an increase, of the amount determined pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.8, as that section read on January 1, 2013, divided by the amount determined pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.8, as that section read on January 1, 2013.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 47, Sec. 61.   (AB 97)   Effective July 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

42289.6.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Quality Education Commission review the eligibility provisions for the establishment of necessary small schools as specified in Sections 42280, 42282, 42283, 42284, and 42285, including the following:

(1) The appropriate size for a necessary small elementary school, a necessary small middle school, and a necessary small high school.

(2) Whether mileage and other
 eligibility requirements are appropriate or need to be modified.

(b) It is further the intent of the Legislature that by January 1, 2006, the Quality Education Commission recommend to the Legislature modifications regarding the size, eligibility requirements, and funding of necessary small schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 871, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Supplemental School Revenues [42400. - 42403.]

42400.

(a) Revenues derived from a transactions and use tax imposed pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 7288.1) of Part 1.7 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall be allocated directly to each school district within the county and to the county office of education on the basis of an equal amount for each unit of average daily attendance within the county. 

(b) The average daily attendance used for purposes of the allocations pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be the same average daily attendance used for purposes of allocations pursuant to Section 8880.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 14, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1993.   Note: Condition in Sec. 4 of Ch. 14 was satisfied by enactment of AB 1930 as Ch. 1024, Stats. 1991, but operative date is not earlier than effective date.)
-------------------------------------------

42401.

(a) Revenues from any transactions and use tax imposed pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 7288.1) of Part 1.7 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall not be considered “allocated local proceeds of taxes” pursuant to Section 41202 of the Education Code or paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution. 

(b) Revenues derived from any transactions and use tax imposed pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 7288.1) of Part 1.7 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall supplement, and shall not be offset against, the allocations made pursuant to Section 2558 or 42238 of the Education Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 14, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1993.   Note: Condition in Sec. 4 of Ch. 14 was satisfied by enactment of AB 1930 as Ch. 1024, Stats. 1991, but operative date is not earlier than effective date.)
-------------------------------------------

42402.

In the event an ordinance is proposed to the voters in a county pursuant to Section 7288.3 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, each school district and the county office of education shall concurrently, as necessary, propose an increase in its appropriations limit pursuant to Section 4 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution in an amount equal to or greater than the revenues derived from any transactions and use tax imposed pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 7288.1) of Part 1.7 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 14, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1993.   Note: Condition in Sec. 4 of Ch. 14 was satisfied by enactment of AB 1930 as Ch. 1024, Stats. 1991, but operative date is not earlier than effective date.)
-------------------------------------------

42403.

For purposes of this chapter, a “school district” includes a community college district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 14, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1993.   Note: Condition in Sec. 4 of Ch. 14 was satisfied by enactment of AB 1930 as Ch. 1024, Stats. 1991, but operative date is not earlier than effective date.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. School District Funds—Expenditures and Appropriations [42600. - 42694.]



  ARTICLE 1. Control of Expenditures [42600. - 42603.]

42600.

The total amount budgeted as the proposed expenditure of the school district for each major classification of school district expenditures listed in the school district budget forms prescribed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall be the maximum amount which may be expended for that classification of expenditures for the school year. Transfers may be made from the designated fund balance or the unappropriated fund balance to any expenditure classification or between expenditure classifications at any time by written resolution of the board of education of any school district governed by a board of education, when filed with the county superintendent of schools and the county auditor, or by written resolution of the board of trustees of any school district not governed by a board of education, when approved by the county superintendent of schools and filed with the county auditor. A resolution providing for the transfers specified in this section shall be approved by a majority vote of the members of the governing board. Nothing in this section shall be construed as affecting Sections 42204 and 85112.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 917, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

42601.

At the close of any school year a school district may, with the approval of the governing board, identify and request the county superintendent of schools to make the transfers between the designated fund balance or the unappropriated fund balance and any expenditure classification or classifications, or balance any expenditure classifications of the budget of the district for that school year as necessary to permit the payment of obligations of the district incurred during that school year. For each elementary, high school, and unified school district that, during the preceding school year, had an average daily attendance less than the level, as appropriate, specified in subdivision (a) of Section 41301, the county superintendent of schools, with the consent of the governing board of the school district, may identify and make the transfers, and shall so notify the districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1462, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

42602.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 42600 and 42610 or any provision of this code to the contrary, the governing board of any school district may, by a majority vote of its membership, and with the approval of the county superintendent of schools, budget and use any unbudgeted income provided during the fiscal year from any source.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 917, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

42603.

The governing board of any school district may direct that moneys held in any fund or account may be temporarily transferred to another fund or account of the district for payment of obligations. The transfer shall be accounted for as temporary borrowing between funds or accounts and shall not be available for appropriation or be considered income to the borrowing fund or account. Amounts transferred shall be repaid either in the same fiscal year, or in the following fiscal year if the transfer takes place within the final 120 calendar days of a fiscal year. Borrowing shall occur only when the fund or account receiving the money will earn sufficient income, during the current fiscal year, to repay the amount transferred. No more than 75 percent of the maximum of moneys held in any fund or account during a current fiscal year may be transferred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 586, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Appropriation of Income Budget Excess [42610. - 42610.]

42610.

Any amounts added to the general reserve of the school district in excess of the amount already budgeted shall not be available for appropriation by the school district for the current fiscal year except by the following procedure. The governing board of the school district shall, by formal action of the board, pass a resolution setting forth the need according to major classification of school district expenditures to be met from any portion of the general reserve derived from assured income in excess of the total amount anticipated in the budget. The resolution shall be submitted to the county superintendent of schools.

The county superintendent of schools shall approve any resolution for the appropriation of income to the extent that the income was not anticipated in the budget of the school district.

On the first day of July of each year, the general reserve together with unexpended balances of appropriations and income in excess of anticipated income for the preceding fiscal year shall be placed to the credit of the school district, and the school district shall include all money so credited in the balance shown in the budget for the ensuing fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 917, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Temporary Transfer—County to Districts, to Finance Excess Expenditure [42620. - 42623.]

42620.

Whenever prior to the receipt by any school district or county school service fund of its state, county, city and county, or district funds, any school district or county school service fund of a county or city and county does not have sufficient money to its credit to meet current expenses of maintenance, the board of supervisors of the county or city and county shall order, and the auditor and treasurer of the county or city and county shall make a temporary transfer from any funds of the county or city and county not immediately needed to pay claims against them to the school fund of the district or county school service fund of the amount needed, not exceeding 85 percent of the amount of money which will accrue to the school district or county school service fund during the fiscal year. Upon the making of the transfer the auditor shall immediately notify the superintendent of schools of the county or city and county of the amount transferred. Each transfer of funds requested under this section shall be granted in order of receipt by the board of supervisors, regardless of whether sufficient county funds are available for transfer to meet pending or anticipated requests of school districts.

The funds transferred under this section to the credit of a school district or county school service fund shall be retransferred by the auditor and treasurer to the fund from which they were taken from the first moneys accruing to the school district or county school service fund and before any other obligation of the school district or county school service fund is paid from the money accruing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42620.1.

(a) Whenever a charter school of a county or city and county does not have sufficient money to its credit, before the charter school receives its state, county, city and county, or district funds, to meet current expenses of maintenance, the board of supervisors of the county or city and county may order, and the auditor and treasurer of the county or city and county shall make, a temporary transfer from any funds of the county or city and county not immediately needed to pay claims against them to the charter school of the amount needed, not exceeding 85 percent of the amount of money that will accrue to the charter school during the fiscal year. Upon the making of a transfer, the auditor shall immediately notify the superintendent of schools of the county or city and county of the amount transferred.
 The board of supervisors may order temporary transfers of funds to charter schools only after ensuring that all transfer requests for school districts and county offices of education have been satisfied pursuant to Section 42620.

(b) The funds transferred under this section to the credit of a charter school shall be retransferred by the auditor and treasurer to the fund from which they were taken from the first moneys accruing to the charter school and before any other obligation of the charter school is paid from the money accruing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 38, Sec. 50.   (SB 1016)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

42621.

The county superintendent of schools of each county, with the approval of the county board of education, may make temporary transfers to a school district
 or charter school that does not have sufficient money to its credit to meet current operating expenses from the county school service fund, in amounts and at times that the county superintendent of schools deems necessary. These transfers shall not exceed 85 percent of the amount of money accruing to the school district or
 charter school
 at the time of transfer. The amounts so transferred shall be repaid to the county school service fund
 before June 30 of the current year from any funds subsequently received by the school district or charter school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 38, Sec. 51.   (SB 1016)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

42622.

The county superintendent of schools, with the approval of the county board of education, may make an apportionment to a school district or charter school from the county school service fund conditional upon the repayment to the fund during the next succeeding fiscal year of the amount apportioned to the school district or charter school and, during the next succeeding fiscal year,
 shall
 transfer the amount of the apportionment from the general fund of the school district or charter school to the county school service fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 38, Sec. 52.   (SB 1016)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

42623.

(a) Upon the request of the county board of education on behalf of a newly organized school district, and upon the order of the county board of supervisors of the county or city and county, the auditor and treasurer of the county or city and county shall make a temporary transfer from any funds of the county or city and county not immediately needed to pay claims against them to the general fund of the newly organized school district for the purpose of meeting the current expense of the school district until the school district receives its first state apportionments or school district tax funds. Upon the making of the transfer, the auditor shall immediately notify the superintendent of schools of the county or the city and county of the amount
 transferred.

(b) The funds transferred under this section to the general fund of a newly organized school district shall be retransferred by the auditor and the treasurer to the fund from which they were taken from the first moneys accruing to the school district after it becomes effective for all purposes pursuant to Section 35534 and before any other obligation of the school district is paid from the money accruing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 386, Sec. 17.   (SB 436)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. General Provisions—Orders, Requisitions and Warrants [42630. - 42652.]

42630.

Except as otherwise provided in this code, money shall be paid from the funds of any school district for the payment of the expenses of the district, only as provided in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42631.

All payments from the funds of a school district shall be made by written order of the governing board of the district. Orders shall be on forms prescribed by the county superintendent of schools unless the warrants are processed by an on-line data processing system. Forms may be printed and furnished by the board of supervisors or the county superintendent of schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

42632.

Each order drawn on the funds of a school district shall be signed by at least a majority of the members of the governing board of the district, or by a person or persons authorized by the governing board to sign orders in its name. No person other than an officer or employee of the district shall be authorized to sign orders.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42633.

The governing board of each school district shall be responsible for filing or causing to be filed with the county superintendent of schools the verified signature of each person, including members of the governing board, authorized to sign orders in its name. Except for districts determined to be fiscally accountable pursuant to Section 42650, no order on the funds of any school district shall be approved by the county superintendent of schools unless the signatures are on file in his office and he is satisfied that the signatures on the order are those of persons authorized to sign the order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

42634.

Each order drawn against the funds of a school district shall be numbered and shall state: (a) the particular fund or funds of the district against which it is drawn, (b) the amount of the payment to be made from each fund, and (c) the rate of salary and the period of service of any employee of the district for whom an order is issued for payment of salary or wages.

If drawn for any purpose other than the payment of salaries or wages of school district employees, the order shall be accompanied by an itemized bill showing the separate items and the price of each. Notwithstanding that requirement, if the county superintendent of schools determines that including an itemized bill with the order is impractical under the system of payment utilized, the itemized bill showing the separate items and the price of each shall instead be retained by the school district and shall be available for audit as directed by the county auditor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1461, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

42635.

Each order drawn against the funds of a school district shall be transmitted to the county superintendent of schools, and, if approved and signed by him shall become a requisition on the county auditor. The county superintendent may prescribe alternative procedures for districts determined to be fiscally accountable pursuant to Section 42650.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

42636.

(a) The county superintendent of schools may examine each order on school district funds transmitted to him or her, in the order in which it is received in his or her office. If it appears that the order is properly drawn for the payment of legally authorized expenses against the proper funds of the district, and that there are sufficient moneys in the fund or funds against which the order is drawn to pay it, the county superintendent shall endorse upon it “examined and approved,” and shall, in attestation thereof, affix his or her signature and number and date the requisition and transmit it directly to the county auditor, in the order in which the order is received in his or her office. The county superintendent may prescribe alternative methods for districts determined to be fiscally accountable pursuant to Section 42650.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the county superintendent may allow electronic transfers, upon approval of the county auditor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 353.)
-------------------------------------------

42637.
